Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-301.03
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Veterans Services Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Veterans’ Affairs;

(2) Director means the Director of Veterans’ Affairs; and

(3) Veterans homes means the homes listed in section 80-315.

Laws 2017, LB340, § 2.